Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,150
Health care coverage of children; eligibility for medical assistance; effect.

When enrolling an individual or making any payment for benefits to an individual or on an individual's behalf, an insurer shall not take into account that the individual is eligible for or is provided medical assistance pursuant to the medical assistance program or a medical assistance plan of another state.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 78.